District of Columbia statutes.
8-508

Seizure and destruction of mattresses.

If on inspection the Director of the Department of Human Services or his assistants find in the District of Columbia any mattress held for sale, exchange, or gift, or delivery in pursuance thereof, which has been used or is composed in whole or in part of materials which have formed part of any mattress used in or about any sanitarium or hospital or by any individual having an infectious or contagious disease, or is composed in whole or in part of secondhand material which has not been thoroughly sterilized and disinfected by a process approved by the Director of the Department of Human Services, or if the Director of the Department of Human Services or his assistants find in the District of Columbia any such materials held for use in the manufacture or renovation of any mattress, the Director of the Department of Human Services shall, after first making and filing in the public records of his office a written order stating the reason therefor, thereupon without further notice cause such mattress or material intended to be used in the manufacture of any mattress to be seized, removed, and destroyed by summary action.

July 3, 1926, 44 Stat. 839, ch. 768, § 8
Aug. 1, 1950, 64 Stat. 393, ch. 513, § 1
1981 Ed., § 6-808.
1973 Ed., § 6-608.